North Carolina, session 2025, HB1074.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-153.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.5. Modifications to adjusted gross income.
…
(b) Other Deductions. – In calculating North Carolina taxable income, a taxpayer may
deduct from the taxpayer's adjusted gross income any of the following items that are included in
the taxpayer's adjusted gross income:
…
(17) An amount, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), of the total
unreimbursed out-of-pocket expenditures for prescribed medications and
pharmacy cost-sharing, excluding any amounts covered by tax-favored
accounts such as a Flexible Spending Account or Health Savings Account. No
deduction is allowed under this subdivision for any amount of prescribed
medication or pharmacy cost-sharing for which a deduction is claimed under
sub-subdivision (a)(2)c. of this section for the same taxable year.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
*H1074-v-1*